Utah statutes.
63A-14-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Commission" means the Independent Executive Branch Ethics Commission, created in Section 63A-14-202.

(2)  "Complainant" means an individual who files a complaint under Subsection 63A-14-402(1)(a).

(3)  "Executive branch elected official" means:

(a)  the governor;

(b)  the lieutenant governor;

(c)  the state auditor;

(d)  the state treasurer; or

(e)  the attorney general.

(4)  "Improper purpose" includes harassing a respondent, causing unwarranted harm to a respondent's reputation, or causing unnecessary expenditure of public funds.

(5)  "Respondent" means the executive branch elected official against whom an ethics complaint described in Section 63A-14-402 is filed.

(6)  "Violation" means a high crime, a misdemeanor, or malfeasance in office.



Enacted by Chapter 426, 2013 General Session

